Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.240

Rights and duties of warehouse operator—Schedule of rates—Posting—Revision.

Every warehouse operator shall annually, during the first week in July, publish by posting in a conspicuous place in each of his or her warehouses the schedule of handling, conditioning, and storage rates filed with the department for the ensuing license year. The schedule shall be kept posted, and the rates shall not be changed during such year except after thirty days' written notice to the director and proper posting of the changes on the licensee's premises.

[ 2011 c 336 s 616; 1991 c 109 s 29; 1983 c 305 s 40; 1963 c 124 s 24.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.